Hawaii statutes.
[§167-20] Furnishing domestic water.
In conjunction with any irrigation project which it has established, and
subject to pertinent provisions of law governing the supply, the board of
agriculture may establish a system for and supply water for domestic purposes
to residents within and in close proximity to the irrigation project. The
system shall be established only if (1) the board determines that it would be
advisable and in the public interest to provide the domestic supply; (2) its
construction and operation by the board has been consented to by the board of
water supply of the county in which the project is situated, and by a majority
of the land occupiers within the irrigation project; and (3) if under normal
conditions of water availability, the operation of the system will not
prejudice or interfere with the supply of irrigation water to the land
occupiers within the project. The board may also subject to the limitations
previously set forth in this section, take over, improve, and operate any existing
system for the supply of domestic water if requested so to do by the owners and
operators of the system. [L 1987, c 306, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next